Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 1. Coercion and Fraud.

Secs. 23.10.005 — 23.10.010.
Coercion to use hotel or store prohibited; penalty.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current law on the crime of coercion see AS 11.41.530.]

Sec. 23.10.015.
False representations to procure employees prohibited.

A person doing business in this state may not personally or through an agent induce an individual to change from one place to another in this state, or bring an individual into this state to work as an employee in this state, by means of false or deceptive representations, false advertising, or false pretenses concerning the kind and character of the work to be done, or the amount and character of the compensation to be paid for the work, or the sanitary or other conditions of employment.

History.

(§ 43-2-43 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1971)

Collateral references. —

51 C.J.S., Labor Relations, §§ 6-15.

Sec. 23.10.020.
Penalty for violation of AS 23.10.015.

A person who, personally or as agent or servant for another, violates AS

23.10.015

is punishable by a fine of not more than $2,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 43-2-44 ALCA1949)

Sec. 23.10.025.
Use of armed guards. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 23.10.030.
Worker’s right of action.

A worker induced to accept employment with a person mentioned in AS

23.10.015

by conduct violating that section has a right of action for damages caused by the false or deceptive representations used to induce the worker to change the worker’s place of employment, against the person directly or indirectly causing the damages.
In addition to the actual damages the worker has sustained, the worker may recover the reasonable attorney fees which the court shall fix, to be taxed as costs.

History.

(§ 43-2-46 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 23.10.035.
Limit of application.

AS

23.10.015

—

23.10.030

may not be construed to interfere with the right of a person to guard or protect the person’s private property, or private interest as provided by law.
AS

23.10.015

—

23.10.030

may be construed only to apply when a worker is brought into the state or induced to go from one place to another in the state by a false pretense, false advertising, or deceptive representation, or is brought into the state under arms, or is moved from one place to another in the state under arms.

History.

(§ 43-2-45 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 23.10.037.
Lie-detector tests.

A person either personally or through an agent or representative may not request or suggest to an employee of the person or to an applicant for employment by the person or require as a condition of employment that the employee or applicant submit to an examination in which a polygraph or other lie-detecting device is used.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to the state or a political subdivision of the state when dealing with police officers in its employ or with persons applying to be employed as police officers. In this subsection, “police officers” includes officers and employees of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities who are stationed at an international airport and have been designated to have the general police powers authorized under AS

02.15.230(a)

.

In this section “person” includes the state and a political subdivision of the state.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 1989)